Massachusetts, session 194th, S2518.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the 
contrary, the Massachusetts state employees’ retirement system shall credit Roberta Wollons, a 
member of the state employees’ retirement system, with creditable service for the service she 
rendered at Indiana University Northwest for the period of January 1, 1995 to August 1, 2006, 
inclusive, for the purpose of determining her superannuation retirement allowance pursuant to 
paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of section 5 of chapter 32 of the General Laws. Before the date 
that any retirement allowance becomes effective for Roberta Wollons, she shall pay into the 
annuity savings fund of the state employees’ retirement system in 1 sum or in installments, upon 
such terms and conditions as the state board of retirement may prescribe, an amount equal to 
what would have been withheld under said chapter 32 as regular deductions from her regular 
compensation during the applicable period at the annual rate of regular compensation for such 
previous service, plus buyback interest. 

of 2 13  SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.